Hawaii statutes.
§171-136 Disposition of public lands within
industrial park. The board shall dispose of economic units within an
industrial park only by lease to eligible lessees or lessees engaged in
commercial uses as provided under paragraph (1)(B). The leases shall be issued
by the board in accordance with this chapter, subject to the following:

(1) Only industrial uses shall be allowed on the
public lands leased; provided that:

(A) The eligible lessee may be allowed to
engage in nonindustrial uses and activities ancillary and necessary to the
eligible lessee's industrial use; and

(B) The board may lease public lands within
the industrial park for commercial uses if the uses are necessary or desirable
to serve other lessees in the industrial park or their employees;

(2) Each eligible lessee shall be subject to a
development plan formulated pursuant to section 171-41 and make the
improvements to the leased public lands required under the development plan;
and

(3) Each eligible lessee shall pay all assessments for
improvements of infrastructure or other public or common facilities within the
industrial park, if the board requires the improvements or assessments as
conditions of the lease. [L 1988, c 361, pt of §1; am L 1991, c 173, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next